Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. Superintendent Of Public Instruction And Department Of Education
1, 2 and 3, in (a), substituted “state superintendent” or similar language for “director” throughout; in the last sentence in (a)(i), substituted “entrusted” for “delegated,” and deleted “or the state superintendent” at the end; in the first sentence in (a)(ix), substituted “superintendent and state department” for “superintendent, the director and the state department”; in (a)(xix), deleted “the director of” preceding “the state agency” near the beginning; in (b), deleted “and the state superintendent” following “the state board” in the first sentence, and deleted the last sentence, which read: “The state department of education shall provide information or data requested by the state board that is necessary to perform duties under
W.S.

21-2-304

”; and made a stylistic change; added (a)(xxii), (a)(xxxii), (a)(xxxiii), and (f).

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The second
2015 amendment, by ch. 179, § 1, in (a)(xxx), inserted “or twelve (12)”, “statewide”, substituted “established by the state superintendent in a manner that best meets the needs of students and school districts” for “selected so that following receipt of scores, students may timely register for senior year classes which may be necessary to allow the student to qualify for a state provided scholarship” and added (xxxvi).

Laws 2015, ch. 179, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2015.

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote (a)(xxx).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 14, § 1, in the middle of the introductory language of (a)(xxxiv), substituted “including, but not limited” for “related,” and at the end, added “privacy and”; in the middle of (a)(xxxiv)(H), added “or trade”; added (a)(xxxiv)(K), and made related changes; and added (a)(xxxvii).

Laws 2017, ch. 14, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 16, 2017.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(xiv), substituted “21-2-204(j)” for “21-2-204(h)” in the second sentence; and in (a)(xxxvi), substituted “21-2-204(h)” for “21-2-204(f)” at the end.

The third
2017 amendment, by ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “virtual education” for “distance education” throughout the section; added the last sentence in (a)(xxxi)(A) , in (a)(xxxi)(B) added “including professional development for teachers and school administrators” in the first sentence and added the second sentence, rewrote (a)(xxxi)(D), which formerly read: “Establishing criteria and necessary components of individual student distance learning plans required by
W.S.

21-13-330

,” added the second sentence of (a)(xxxi)(E), added (a)(xxxi)(F), and made related changes.

While neither amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(xxxi)(A), deleted “or postsecondary faculty who meet the requirements of W.S. 21-7-303(b)” at the end of the first sentence.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch 102, § 1, in (a)(xx), deleted the last sentence, which read: “Not later than January 10 of each year and with the assistance of participating agencies, an annual report on the status of the statewide education technology plan shall be prepared and issued by the state superintendent”; and in (f), deleted the first two sentences, which read: “Not later than October 15 each year, the state superintendent shall prepare a report on the general status of all public schools for the legislature. The report shall include the quality of education including any proposed improvement to address any shortfalls, the relevance of education, the measurement of achievement of educational goals, the improvement of learning and any suggested innovations in education” and deleted “based upon the analysis of the quality indicators specified under this subsection.”

Laws 2019, ch. 102, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2019.

The third 2019 amendment, by ch. 191, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a)(xxxi), substituted “education. Courses taught pursuant to an agreement entered into under W.S. 21-13-330(m) shall not be subject to this paragraph. The rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this paragraph shall meet the requirements of this paragraph by” for “education by.”

Pursuant to the conflicting legislation provision, all of these amendments have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(xxxi), added “or pursuant to W.S. 21-13-330(n)” following “W.S. 21-13-330(m).”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 125, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(xxxviii) and (a)(xxxix); and added (g).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “career and technical” for “career-vocational” throughout the section.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (a)(xl).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2015, ch. 30, amending this section, states in relevant part: “in accordance with Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 (Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).”

Laws 2015, ch. 179, amending this section, states in relevant part: “conforming Wyoming Statute to Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014)...”.

See discussion below.

Portions of this section as amended by Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, ch. 1) have been held unconstitutional.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014). For the text of this section prior to the 2013 enactment, see the 2011 edition and the 2012 supplement edition of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Laws 2014, ch. 27, § 2, amended portions of subsection (a) of this section as that subsection existed prior to the enactment of Laws 2013, ch. 1. Section 2 of the 2014 act superseded alternative provisions in section 1 of that act and became effective July 1, 2014, upon the Governor's certification of the issuance of a final court order as specified in section 3(a) of the act. The 2014, ch. 27 amendment is set out below.

Laws 2014, ch. 125, § 3, amended portions of subsection (a) of this section as that subsection existed prior to the enactment of Laws 2013, ch. 1. Section 3 of the 2014 act superseded alternative provisions in section 1 of that act and became effective July 1, 2014, upon the Governor's certification of the issuance of a final court order as specified in section 5 of the act. The 2014, ch. 125 amendment is set out below.

Laws 2014, ch. 27, § 2 provides:

Section 2.

W.S. 21-2-202(a) by creating a new paragraph (xxxv), as in effect prior to the enactment of 2013 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 1, [is] amended to read:

21-2-202

.
Duties of the state superintendent.

(a)
In addition to any other duties assigned by law, the state superintendent shall:

(xxxv)
Review and make available suitable materials for suicide prevention education as required for school district teachers and school administrators under
W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxiii).

Laws 2014, ch. 125, § 3 provides:

Section 3.

W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxxiv), as in effect prior to the enactment of 2013 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 1, is amended to read:

21-2-202

.
Duties of the state superintendent.

(a)
In addition to other duties assigned by law, the state superintendent shall:

(xxxiv)
With the department of enterprise technology services, establish criteria for the collection, storage, management and reporting of department of education data related to teacher certification, statewide education accountability and assessment and the administration of the school finance system. In carrying out this paragraph, the state superintendent and the department of enterprise technology services shall develop a data security plan that includes:

(A)
Guidelines for authorizing access to student data, including authentication of authorized access;

(B)
Privacy compliance standards;

(C)
Privacy and security audits;

(D)
Breach planning, notification and procedures pertaining thereto;

(E)
Data retention and disposition policies;

(F)
Data security policies including electronic, physical and administrative safeguards such as data encryption and employee training;

(G)
Routine and ongoing compliance with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA) and other privacy laws and policies;

(H)
Prohibition of the sale of student data to private entities or organizations; and

(J)
All personally identifiable student information being reported to the department of education or the department of enterprise technology by a student's Wyoming student record identification and locator number as issued by the department of education.

There is no subparagraph (a)(xix)(I) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 201, effective July 1, 1997, provides: “In fulfilling its responsibility imposed by the Wyoming supreme court under Campbell County School District No. 1, et al., v. State of Wyoming, et al., (907 P.2d. 1238, Wyo., 1995), for establishing a school finance system which ensures each Wyoming student an opportunity to receive a proper education and which also assures the availability of adequate school buildings and facilities for the delivery of the proper education, the legislature directs activities and actions specified within this part [Part II of the act] in order to commence the implementation of the finance system and to assist continued development and final completion of this system.”

Laws 2003, ch. 208, § 103(a), directs the state department of education, at least once every 5 years, to establish a process to review the adequacy of the staffing guidelines established under W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxiii). The schedule for the review process is to as nearly as possible coincide with the periodic reconfiguration of the education resource block grant model.

Laws 2008, ch. 95, § 503, provides:

“(a) To assist school districts with developing distance education programs available from the state network of distance education courses under W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxxi)(A), as amended by Section 501 of this act, the state superintendent shall establish a grant program available to applicant school districts, community college districts and the University of Wyoming in accordance with this section.
Program grants shall be available for development and maintenance of distance education programs delivering the core courses within the required statewide education program, components of the success curriculum required for participation in the Hathaway student scholarship program specified by W.S.

21-16-1307

, dual enrollment courses and for delivering advanced-placement courses.
Program grants may be used by grant recipients for addressing necessary professional development requirements, program maintenance and operational needs, accreditation requirements, program evaluation and for other necessary program components to comply with requirements imposed upon distance education programs under W.S.

21-13-330

, as amended by Section 501 of this act.

“(b)
A process for grant administration under this section shall be established by the state superintendent in sufficient time to enable awarding of grants to applicant school districts, community college districts and the university by not later than August 15, 2008, for use in implementing and operating distance education programs beginning with school year 2008-2009.
Notice of the grant program together with necessary application forms and program information shall be provided to school districts, community colleges and the university by May 1, 2008.
Evaluation of applications shall be based upon criteria specified under subsection (a) of this section and shall prioritize applications accordingly.
Grants amounts for a successful applicant shall at minimum consider the number of students estimated to participate in the program, total program costs and if applicable, historical student success in the program.
Application for school year 2009-2010 awards shall commence May 1, 2009, and awards shall be granted by not later than August 15, 2009.

“(c)
Each grant recipient shall report to the state superintendent on the expenditure of grant amounts awarded under this section, the number of students enrolling in the distance education program receiving grant assistance, the number of students successfully completing the distance education program, the impact of the grant assistance on compliance with W.S.

21-13-330

and an evaluation of the distance education program in addressing student needs.
The state superintendent shall compile the reports collected under this subsection and shall by not later than
November 1, 2009, report the compilation to the joint education interim committee together with recommendations for program continuation.

“(d)
The state superintendent shall fund the grant program established under this section from amounts contained within the school foundation program account 2009-2010 biennial budget (Agency 205) for distance learning incentive payments.
Expenditures of this appropriation shall be authorized for the period commencing July 1, 2008, and ending June 30, 2010.”

Laws 2008, ch. 95, § 505, provides: “For purposes of administering and implementing distance education pursuant to W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxxi) and

21-13-330

, as amended under Section 501 of this act, the department of education shall by rule and regulation establish guidelines prescribing process and procedural requirements for school districts in responding to requests for student participation in distance education programs.
The proposed guidelines shall be reported to the joint education interim committee prior to August 31, 2008.”

Meaning of “this code.” —

The phrase “this code,” as used in this section, apparently refers to the Wyoming Education Code of 1969 (§§

21-1-101

through

21-13-721

).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 115, § 2, provides:

“There is appropriated six hundred two thousand eight hundred dollars ($602,800.00) for the fiscal biennium, commencing July 1, 2006 from the school foundation program account to the state superintendent of public instruction for purposes of this act to ensure each Wyoming eleventh grade student is provided an opportunity to take a curriculum based achievement college entrance examination or a jobs skills assessment test at no cost. The state superintendent shall enter into agreements with an administrator of the selected college entrance examination and with an administrator of the selected jobs skills assessment test to ensure each Wyoming eleventh grade student is provided the opportunity to take either one (1) examination or one (1) test at no cost.”

Laws 2008, ch. 95, § 504, provides:

“Two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($275,000.00) is appropriated from the public school foundation program account to the department of education that shall be expended only for the implementation and administration of distance education as authorized under W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxxi) and

21-13-330

, as amended under Section 501 of this act, and for an at-will employee position in accordance with W.S. 9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F). This appropriation shall be for the period commencing on the effective date of this section and ending June 30, 2010.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Quoted

in

Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 907 P.2d 1238,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Natrona County Sch. Dist. No. 1 v.
Natrona County Sch. Dist. v. Ryan, 764 P.2d 1019,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1988);
Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. Catchpole,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 147

, 6 P.3d 1275 (Wyo. 2000).